Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202629-3905
Appointed counsel; fees and expenses.

Appointed counsel for an indigent felony defendant other than the public defender or county conflict counsel shall apply to the district court which appointed him or her for all expenses reasonably necessary to permit him or her to effectively and competently represent his or her client and for fees for services performed pursuant to such appointment, except that if the defendant was not bound over for trial in the district court, the application shall be made in the appointing court. The court, upon hearing the application, shall fix reasonable expenses and fees, and the county board shall allow payment to counsel in the full amount determined by the court.

Laws 1972, LB 1463, § 11;

Laws 1979, LB 241, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 29-1804.12;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 23;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 35.
July 18, 2026
Either appointed counsel or the county involved may appeal to the Supreme Court from an order determining the amount of fees and expenses allowed appointed counsel under this section. In re Claim of Rehm and Faesser, 226 Neb. 107, 410 N.W.2d 92 (1987).